Hawaii statutes.
§452-14 Examination. The department of
commerce and consumer affairs or the board may contract with professional
testing services to prepare, administer, and grade the examination for
applicants as may be required for the purposes of this chapter. The examination
of applicants for a license to practice massage shall be conducted under rules
prescribed by the board and shall consist of a written examination which is not
confined to any specific system or method and which is consistent with the
practical and theoretical requirements of the occupation as provided by this
chapter. [L 1947, c 192, §14; RL 1955, §63-14; HRS §452-14; am L 1980, c 208,
§16; am L 1986, c 99, §6 and c 310, §3; am L 1987, c 190, §6; am L 1988, c 157,
§1]

Cross References

Disposal of examination papers, see §94-5.

Professional testing services, see §26-9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next